District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

13-702

Jury trials in civil cases in Court of General Sessions.

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 142(5)(A)

History

1981 Ed., § 13-702.

Prior Codifications